California, session 20252026, SB884.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Protect Our Polls Act.(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Free, fair, and secure elections are fundamental to democracy, and all eligible voters must be able to cast a ballot without fear of intimidation, interference, or disruption.(2) Certain crimes have less exigent circumstances than others and the value of arresting and detaining those accused is outweighed by the harm it creates in sensitive areas like polling places.(3) Existing law prohibits electioneering within 100 feet of polling places to protect voters from undue influence and intimidation while exercising their right to vote.(4) Recent actions to weaponize law enforcement authority for political purposes, such as Sheriff Chad Bianco’s seizure of ballots in Riverside County, have given rise to unprecedented concerns about law enforcement interference in the 2026 general election.(5) Government officials and political allies have publicly discussed deploying law enforcement officers near polling places, creating serious concerns about voter intimidation and unlawful interference with the right to vote.(6) During the November 2025 special election, the United States Department of Justice deployed personnel to monitor polling sites in five California counties, including Fresno, Kern, Los Angeles, Orange, and Riverside, demonstrating that these threats are not merely hypothetical.(7) Proposed legislation such as the SAVE Act and executive actions targeting vote-by-mail vote by mail ballots reflect broader efforts to disenfranchise voters, suppress turnout among minority communities, and undermine California’s constitutional authority to administer its own elections.(8) Recent changes to United States Postal Service postmark practices have increased the risk that timely mailed ballots may be rejected because of postal delays outside the voter’s control, threatening ballot access for eligible voters across the state.(9) California must act to preserve the integrity of its elections by protecting polling places from intimidation, ensuring access to vote-by-mail vote by mail ballots, and maintaining safe and secure access to the ballot box for every eligible voter.(c) The Governor is encouraged to use law enforcement to enforce this act.SEC. 2. Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 400) is added to Division 0.5 of the Elections Code, to read: CHAPTER 5. Elections in 2026 through 2029400. This chapter applies to any regular or special election, beginning with the November 3, 2026, statewide general election, held in 2026 through 2029, inclusive, or proclaimed in 2029.401.(a)(1)Notwithstanding Section 3025.5, Section 4005, or any other law, a county shall provide at least two vote by mail ballot drop-off locations within the county or at least one vote by mail ballot drop-off location for every 11,250 registered voters, whichever results in more vote by mail ballot drop-off locations.(2)Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a county with fewer than 11,250 registered voters shall provide at least one vote by mail ballot drop-off location.(b)401. All vote by mail ballot drop-off locations shall be open at least during regular business hours beginning not less than 30 days before the day of the election and continuing through and including the day of the election.402. County election officials are encouraged to use public buildings for polling places.403.Notwithstanding Section 3020, Section 4103, or any other law, a vote by mail ballot is timely cast if it is received by the voter’s elections official via the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company no later than 10 days after election day and either of the following is satisfied:(a)The ballot is postmarked on or before election day or is time stamped or date stamped by a bona fide private mail delivery company on or before election day, or it is otherwise indicated by the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company that the ballot was mailed on or before election day.(b)If the ballot has no postmark, a postmark with no date, or an illegible postmark, and no other information is available from the United States Postal Service or the bona fide private mail delivery company to indicate the date on which the ballot was mailed, the vote by mail ballot identification envelope is date stamped by the elections official upon receipt of the vote by mail ballot from the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company, and is signed and dated pursuant to Section 3011 on or before election day.404.403. A law enforcement officer shall not arrest any person within 200 feet of a polling place on election day during the time in which the polling place is open, except for a crime related to disrupting the operation of the polling place, a crime against a person, or a crime against property. This section does not provide legal amnesty for any crime committed within the buffer zone on election day.405.404. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the prohibition on electioneering in subdivision (a) of Section 319.5 may be expanded by a county board of supervisors to up to 200 feet of either of the following:(1) The entrance to a building that contains a polling place, an elections official’s office, or a satellite location.(2) An outdoor site, including a curbside voting area, at which a voter may cast or drop off a ballot.(b) A violation of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor as provided in Section 18370 or 18371.(c) If a county board of supervisors expands the area in which electioneering is prohibited pursuant to subdivision (a), the approved distance shall be uniform at every location described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) within the county.406.405. (a) A law enforcement officer shall abide by and enforce Sections 404 and 405 403 and 404 and subdivision (a) of Section 18370.(b) A law enforcement officer shall notify the Secretary of State and Attorney General of a suspected, planned, or actual violation of Section 404 or 405 403 or 404 or subdivision (a) of Section 18370.407.406. To enforce the requirements of this chapter, the state may place reasonable restrictions on a polling place located on state property, and a local government may place reasonable restrictions on a polling place located on local government property.408.407. (a) Notwithstanding Section 14212, Section 4005, or any other law, on election day a county elections official may extend the time for closing the polls at any polling place if the county elections official determines, in consultation with the county counsel, in the official’s discretion, that voting at the polling place was disrupted as a result of a violation of Section 404 or 405. 403 or 404.(b) If the time for closing the polls is extended pursuant to subdivision (a), all votes cast during the time that the closing of the polls is extended shall be by provisional ballot. Any provisional ballots cast pursuant to this subdivision shall be separated and held apart from other provisional ballots cast by voters prior to the time the closing of the polls was extended.409.408. The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.410.409. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 4. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To ensure eligible voters may vote safely and securely at the November 3, 2026, statewide general election, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.